Nevada, session 83, AB126.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 200.700 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.700 As used in NRS 200.700 to 200.760, inclusive, unless
the context otherwise requires:
1. “Artificial intelligence-generated minor” means a fictional
human that:
(a) Is generated through the use of artificial intelligence; and
(b) Has anatomical or physical features that make the fictional
human appear to be a minor.
2. “Community” means the area from which a jury is or
would be selected for the court in which the action is tried.
3. “Obscene” means any item or material which:
(a) An average person applying contemporary adult
community standards would find, taken as a whole, appeals to
prurient interest; and
(b) Taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political
or scientific value.
4. “Performance” means any play, film, photograph, computer-
generated image, electronic representation, dance or other visual
presentation.
[2.] 5. “Promote” means to produce, direct, procure,
manufacture, sell, give, lend, publish, distribute, exhibit, advertise or
possess for the purpose of distribution.
[3.] 6. “Sexual conduct” means sexual intercourse, lewd
exhibition of the genitals, fellatio, cunnilingus, bestiality, anal
-
*AB126*

– 3 –
intercourse, excretion, sado-masochistic abuse, masturbation, or the
penetration of any part of a person’s body or of any object
manipulated or inserted by a person into the genital or anal opening
of the body of another.
[4.] 7. “Sexual portrayal” means the depiction of a person in a
manner which appeals to the prurient interest in sex and which does
not have serious literary, artistic, political or scientific value.
Sec. 2. NRS 200.725 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.725 1. A person [who] shall not knowingly [prepares,
advertises] prepare, advertise or [distributes] distribute any item or
material that [depicts] :
(a) Depicts a minor engaging in, or simulating, or assisting
others to engage in or simulate, sexual conduct ; or
(b) Contains or incorporates, in any manner, an:
(1) Image of a minor that has been mechanically or
digitally altered, including, without limitation, through the use of
artificial intelligence, to depict the minor engaging in or
simulating, or assisting others to engage in or simulate, sexual
conduct; or
(2) Obscene depiction of an artificial intelligence-generated
minor engaging in or simulating, or assisting others to engage in
or simulate, sexual conduct.
2. A person who violates any provision of subsection 1 is
guilty of a category B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment
in the state prison for a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a
maximum term of not more than 15 years, or by a fine of not more
than $15,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
Sec. 3. NRS 200.730 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.730 1. A person [who] shall not knowingly and willfully
[has] have in his or her possession for any purpose any film,
photograph or other visual presentation [depicting] that:
(a) Depicts a person under the age of 16 years as the subject of a
sexual portrayal or engaging in or simulating, or assisting others to
engage in or simulate, sexual conduct [:
1.] ; or
(b) Contains or incorporates, in any manner, an:
(1) Image of a minor that has been mechanically or
digitally altered, including, without limitation, through the use of
artificial intelligence, to depict the minor as the subject of a sexual
portrayal or engaging in or simulating, or assisting others to
engage in or simulate, sexual conduct; or
(2) Obscene depiction of an artificial intelligence-generated
minor as the subject of a sexual portrayal or engaging in or
simulating, or assisting others to engage in or simulate, sexual
conduct.
-
*AB126*

– 4 –
2. A person who violates any provision of subsection 1:
(a) For the first offense, is guilty of a category B felony and
shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years, and may be further punished by a fine of not
more than $5,000.
[2.] (b) For any subsequent offense, is guilty of a category A
felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of life
with the possibility of parole, and may be further punished by a fine
of not more than $5,000.
Sec. 4. NRS 202.876 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.876 “Violent or sexual offense” means any act that, if
prosecuted in this State, would constitute any of the following
offenses:
1. Murder or voluntary manslaughter pursuant to NRS 200.010
to 200.260, inclusive.
2. Mayhem pursuant to NRS 200.280.
3. Kidnapping pursuant to NRS 200.310 to 200.340, inclusive.
4. Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366.
5. Robbery pursuant to NRS 200.380.
6. Administering poison or another noxious or destructive
substance or liquid with intent to cause death pursuant to
NRS 200.390.
7. Battery with intent to commit a crime pursuant to
NRS 200.400.
8. Administering a drug or controlled substance to another
person with the intent to enable or assist the commission of a felony
or crime of violence pursuant to NRS 200.405 or 200.408.
9. False imprisonment pursuant to NRS 200.460 if the false
imprisonment involves the use or threatened use of force or violence
against the victim or the use or threatened use of a firearm or a
deadly weapon.
10. Assault with a deadly weapon pursuant to NRS 200.471.
11. Battery which is committed with the use of a deadly
weapon or which results in substantial bodily harm as described in
NRS 200.481 or battery which is committed by strangulation as
described in NRS 200.481 or 200.485.
12. An offense involving pornography and a minor or an
artificial intelligence-generated minor pursuant to NRS 200.710 or
200.720.
13. Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210.
14. Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230.
-
*AB126*

– 5 –
15. An offense involving pandering or sex trafficking in
violation of NRS 201.300, prostitution in violation of NRS 201.320
or advancing prostitution in violation of NRS 201.395.
16. Coercion pursuant to NRS 207.190, if the coercion
involves the use or threatened use of force or violence against the
victim or the use or threatened use of a firearm or a deadly weapon.
17. An attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit an offense
listed in this section.
Sec. 5. NRS 50.700 is hereby amended to read as follows:
50.700 1. In any criminal or juvenile delinquency action
relating to the commission of a sexual offense, a court may not order
the victim of or a witness to the sexual offense to take or submit to a
psychological or psychiatric examination.
2. The court may exclude the testimony of a licensed
psychologist, psychiatrist or clinical social worker who performed a
psychological or psychiatric examination on the victim or witness if:
(a) There is a prima facie showing of a compelling need for an
additional psychological or psychiatric examination of the victim or
witness by a licensed psychologist, psychiatrist or clinical social
worker; and
(b) The victim or witness refuses to submit to an additional
psychological or psychiatric examination by a licensed psychologist,
psychiatrist or clinical social worker.
3. In determining whether there is a prima facie showing of a
compelling need for an additional psychological or psychiatric
examination of the victim or witness pursuant to subsection 2, the
court must consider whether:
(a) There is a reasonable basis for believing that the mental or
emotional state of the victim or witness may have affected his or her
ability to perceive and relate events relevant to the criminal
prosecution; and
(b) Any corroboration of the offense exists beyond the
testimony of the victim or witness.
4. If the court determines there is a prima facie showing of a
compelling need for an additional psychological or psychiatric
examination of the victim or witness, the court shall issue a factual
finding that details with particularity the reasons why an additional
psychological or psychiatric examination of the victim or witness is
warranted.
5. If the court issues a factual finding pursuant to subsection 4
and the victim or witness consents to an additional psychological or
psychiatric examination, the court shall set the parameters for the
examination consistent with the purpose of determining the ability
of the victim or witness to perceive and relate events relevant to the
criminal prosecution.
-
*AB126*

– 6 –
6. As used in this section, “sexual offense” includes, without
limitation:
(a) An offense that is found to be sexually motivated pursuant to
NRS 175.547 or 207.193;
(b) Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366;
(c) Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368;
(d) Battery with intent to commit sexual assault pursuant to
NRS 200.400;
(e) Abuse of a child pursuant to NRS 200.508, if the abuse
involved sexual abuse or sexual exploitation;
(f) An offense involving pornography and a minor or an
artificial intelligence-generated minor pursuant to NRS 200.710 to
200.730, inclusive;
(g) Fertility fraud pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
NRS 200.975;
(h) Incest pursuant to NRS 201.180;
(i) Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210;
(j) Indecent or obscene exposure pursuant to NRS 201.220;
(k) Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230;
(l) Pandering or sex trafficking of a child pursuant to
NRS 201.300;
(m) An offense involving the administration of a drug to another
person with the intent to enable or assist the commission of a felony
pursuant to NRS 200.405, if the felony is an offense listed in this
section;
(n) An offense involving the administration of a controlled
substance to another person with the intent to enable or assist the
commission of a crime of violence pursuant to NRS 200.408, if the
crime of violence is an offense listed in this section;
(o) Sexual penetration of a dead human body pursuant to
NRS 201.450;
(p) A violation of NRS 201.553;
(q) Luring a child or a person with mental illness pursuant to
NRS 201.560;
(r) Any other offense that has an element involving a sexual act
or sexual conduct with another person; or
(s) Any attempt or conspiracy to commit an offense listed in this
subsection.
Sec. 6. NRS 62B.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62B.270 1. A public institution or agency to which a juvenile
court commits a child or the licensing authority of a private
institution to which a juvenile court commits a child, including,
without limitation, a facility for the detention of children, shall
secure from appropriate law enforcement agencies information on
-
*AB126*

– 7 –
the background and personal history of each employee of the
institution or agency to determine:
(a) Whether the employee has been convicted of:
(1) Murder, voluntary manslaughter, involuntary
manslaughter or mayhem;
(2) Any other felony involving the use or threatened use of
force or violence or the use of a firearm or other deadly weapon;
(3) Assault with intent to kill or to commit sexual assault or
mayhem;
(4) Battery which results in substantial bodily harm to the
victim;
(5) Battery that constitutes domestic violence that is
punishable as a felony;
(6) Battery that constitutes domestic violence, other than a
battery described in subparagraph (5), within the immediately
preceding 3 years;
(7) Sexual assault, statutory sexual seduction, incest,
lewdness, indecent exposure, an offense involving pornography and
a minor or an artificial intelligence generated-minor or any other
sexually related crime;
(8) A crime involving pandering or prostitution, including,
without limitation, a violation of any provision of NRS 201.295 to
201.440, inclusive, other than a violation of NRS 201.353 or
201.354 by engaging in prostitution;
(9) Abuse or neglect of a child, including, without limitation,
a violation of any provision of NRS 200.508 or 200.5083;
(10) A violation of any federal or state law regulating the
possession, distribution or use of any controlled substance or any
dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of NRS within the
immediately preceding 3 years;
(11) A violation of any federal or state law prohibiting
driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance that is
punishable as a felony;
(12) A violation of any federal or state law prohibiting
driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance, other
than a violation described in subparagraph (11), within the
immediately preceding 3 years;
(13) Abuse, neglect, exploitation, isolation or abandonment
of older persons or vulnerable persons, including, without
limitation, a violation of any provision of NRS 200.5091 to
200.50995, inclusive, or a law of any other jurisdiction that
prohibits the same or similar conduct; or
-
*AB126*

– 8 –
(14) Any offense involving arson, fraud, theft,
embezzlement, burglary, robbery, fraudulent conversion,
misappropriation of property or perjury within the immediately
preceding 7 years; or
(b) Whether there are criminal charges pending against the
employee for a crime listed in paragraph (a).
2. An employee of the public or private institution or agency
must submit to the public institution or agency or the licensing
authority, as applicable, a complete set of fingerprints and written
authorization to forward those fingerprints to the Central Repository
for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission to the
Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report.
3. The public institution or agency or the licensing authority, as
applicable, may exchange with the Central Repository or the Federal
Bureau of Investigation any information concerning the fingerprints
submitted.
4. The public institution or agency or the licensing authority, as
applicable, may charge an employee investigated pursuant to this
section for the reasonable cost of that investigation.
5. When a report from the Federal Bureau of Investigation is
received by the Central Repository, the Central Repository shall
immediately forward a copy of the report to the public institution or
agency or the licensing authority, as applicable, for a determination
of whether the employee has criminal charges pending against him
or her for a crime listed in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 or has been
convicted of a crime listed in paragraph (a) of subsection 1.
6. A person who is required to submit to an investigation
required pursuant to this section shall not have contact with a child
without supervision in a public or private institution or agency to
which a juvenile court commits a child, including, without
limitation, a facility for the detention of children, before the
investigation of the background and personal history of the person
has been conducted.
7. The public institution or agency or the licensing authority, as
applicable, shall conduct an investigation of each employee of the
institution or agency pursuant to this section at least once every 5
years after the initial investigation.
8. For the purposes of this section, the period during which
criminal charges are pending against an employee for a crime listed
in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 begins when the employee is
arrested for such a crime and ends when:
(a) A determination is made as to the guilt or innocence of the
employee with regard to such a crime at a trial or by a plea; or
(b) The prosecuting attorney makes a determination to:
-
*AB126*

– 9 –
(1) Decline charging the employee with a crime listed in
paragraph (a) of subsection 1; or
(2) Proceed with charges against the employee for only one
or more crimes not listed in paragraph (a) of subsection 1.
Sec. 7. NRS 62C.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62C.120 1. If a petition filed pursuant to the provisions of
this title contains allegations that a child committed an unlawful act
which would have been a sexual offense if committed by an adult or
which involved the use or threatened use of force or violence against
the victim, the district attorney shall provide to the victim and, if the
victim is less than 18 years of age, to the parent or guardian of the
victim, as soon as practicable after the petition is filed,
documentation that includes:
(a) A form advising the victim and the parent or guardian of the
victim of their rights pursuant to the provisions of this title; and
(b) The form or procedure that must be used to request
disclosure pursuant to NRS 62D.440.
2. As used in this section, “sexual offense” means:
(a) Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366;
(b) Battery with intent to commit sexual assault pursuant to
NRS 200.400;
(c) An offense involving pornography and a minor or an
artificial intelligence-generated minor pursuant to NRS 200.710 to
200.730, inclusive;
(d) Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210;
(e) Indecent or obscene exposure pursuant to NRS 201.220;
(f) Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230;
(g) Sexual penetration of a dead human body pursuant to
NRS 201.450;
(h) Luring a child or person with mental illness pursuant to NRS
201.560, if punishable as a felony; or
(i) An attempt to commit an offense listed in this subsection.
Sec. 8. NRS 62F.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62F.100 As used in NRS 62F.100 to 62F.150, inclusive, unless
the context otherwise requires, “sexual offense” means:
1. Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366;
2. Battery with intent to commit sexual assault pursuant to
NRS 200.400;
3. An offense involving pornography and a minor or an
artificial intelligence-generated minor pursuant to NRS 200.710 to
200.730, inclusive;
4. Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210, if
punishable as a felony;
5. Indecent or obscene exposure pursuant to NRS 201.220, if
punishable as a felony;
-
*AB126*

– 10 –
6. Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230;
7. Sexual penetration of a dead human body pursuant to
NRS 201.450;
8. Luring a child or person with mental illness pursuant to
NRS 201.560, if punishable as a felony; or
9. An attempt to commit an offense listed in this section, if
punishable as a felony.
Sec. 9. NRS 62F.225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62F.225 1. “Sexual offense” means:
(a) Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366;
(b) An offense involving pornography and a minor or an
artificial intelligence-generated minor pursuant to NRS 200.710 to
200.730, inclusive;
(c) Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230;
(d) An attempt or conspiracy to commit an offense listed in
paragraph (a), (b) or (c), if punishable as a felony;
(e) An offense that is determined to be sexually motivated
pursuant to NRS 175.547 or 207.193; or
(f) An aggravated sexual offense.
2. The term does not include an offense involving consensual
sexual conduct if the victim was:
(a) An adult, unless the adult was under the custodial authority
of the offender at the time of the offense; or
(b) At least 13 years of age and the offender was not more than
4 years older than the victim at the time of the commission of the
offense.
Sec. 10. NRS 62G.223 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62G.223 1. A department of juvenile justice services shall
secure from appropriate law enforcement agencies information on
the background and personal history of each applicant for
employment with the department of juvenile justice services, and
each employee of the department of juvenile justice services, to
determine:
(a) Whether the applicant or employee has been convicted of:
(1) Murder, voluntary manslaughter, involuntary
manslaughter or mayhem;
(2) Any felony involving the use or threatened use of force or
violence or the use of a firearm or other deadly weapon;
(3) Assault with intent to kill or to commit sexual assault or
mayhem;
(4) Battery which results in substantial bodily harm to the
victim;
(5) Battery that constitutes domestic violence that is
punishable as a felony;
-
*AB126*

– 11 –
(6) Battery that constitutes domestic violence, other than a
battery described in subparagraph (5), within the immediately
preceding 3 years;
(7) Sexual assault, statutory sexual seduction, incest,
lewdness, indecent exposure or an offense involving pornography
and a minor [;] or an artificial intelligence-generated minor;
(8) A crime involving pandering or prostitution, including,
without limitation, a violation of any provision of NRS 201.295 to
201.440, inclusive;
(9) Abuse or neglect of a child, including, without limitation,
a violation of any provision of NRS 200.508 or 200.5083 or
contributory delinquency;
(10) A violation of any federal or state law regulating the
possession, distribution or use of any controlled substance or any
dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of NRS;
(11) A violation of any federal or state law prohibiting
driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance that is
punishable as a felony;
(12) A violation of any federal or state law prohibiting
driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance, other
than a violation described in subparagraph (11), within the
immediately preceding 3 years;
(13) Abuse, neglect, exploitation, isolation or abandonment
of older persons or vulnerable persons, including, without
limitation, a violation of any provision of NRS 200.5091 to
200.50995, inclusive, or a law of any other jurisdiction that
prohibits the same or similar conduct; or
(14) Any offense involving arson, fraud, theft,
embezzlement, burglary, robbery, fraudulent conversion,
misappropriation of property or perjury within the immediately
preceding 7 years; or
(b) Whether there are criminal charges pending against the
applicant or employee for a violation of an offense listed in
paragraph (a).
2. A department of juvenile justice services shall request
information from:
(a) The Statewide Central Registry concerning an applicant for
employment with the department of juvenile justice services, or an
employee of the department of juvenile justice services, to
determine whether there has been a substantiated report of child
abuse or neglect made against the applicant or employee; and
(b) The central registry of information concerning the abuse or
neglect of a child established by any other state in which the
-
*AB126*

– 12 –
applicant or employee resided within the immediately preceding 5
years to ensure satisfactory clearance with that registry.
3. Each applicant for employment with the department of
juvenile justice services, and each employee of the department of
juvenile justice services, must submit to the department of juvenile
justice services:
(a) A complete set of his or her fingerprints and written
authorization to forward those fingerprints to the Central Repository
for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission to the
Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report; and
(b) Written authorization for the department of juvenile justice
services to obtain any information that may be available from the
Statewide Central Registry or the central registry of information
concerning the abuse or neglect of a child established by any other
state in which the applicant or employee resided within the
immediately preceding 5 years.
4. The department of juvenile justice services may exchange
with the Central Repository or the Federal Bureau of Investigation
any information concerning the fingerprints submitted pursuant to
this section.
5. When a report from the Federal Bureau of Investigation is
received by the Central Repository, the Central Repository shall
immediately forward a copy of the report to the department of
juvenile justice services for a determination of whether the applicant
or employee has criminal charges pending against him or her for a
crime listed in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 or has been convicted
of a crime listed in paragraph (a) of subsection 1.
6. A department of juvenile justice services shall conduct an
investigation of each employee of the department pursuant to this
section at least once every 5 years after the initial investigation.
7. As used in this section, “Statewide Central Registry” means
the Statewide Central Registry for the Collection of Information
Concerning the Abuse or Neglect of a Child established by
NRS 432.100.
Sec. 11. NRS 62G.353 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62G.353 1. A department of juvenile justice services shall
secure from appropriate law enforcement agencies information on
the background and personal history of each applicant for
employment with the department of juvenile justice services, and
each employee of the department of juvenile justice services, to
determine:
(a) Whether the applicant or employee has been convicted of:
(1) Murder, voluntary manslaughter, involuntary
manslaughter or mayhem;
-
*AB126*

– 13 –
(2) Any felony involving the use or threatened use of force or
violence or the use of a firearm or other deadly weapon;
(3) Assault with intent to kill or to commit sexual assault or
mayhem;
(4) Battery which results in substantial bodily harm to the
victim;
(5) Battery that constitutes domestic violence that is
punishable as a felony;
(6) Battery that constitutes domestic violence, other than a
battery described in subparagraph (5), within the immediately
preceding 3 years;
(7) Sexual assault, statutory sexual seduction, incest,
lewdness, indecent exposure or an offense involving pornography
and a minor [;] or an artificial intelligence-generated minor;
(8) A crime involving pandering or prostitution, including,
without limitation, a violation of any provision of NRS 201.295 to
201.440, inclusive;
(9) Abuse or neglect of a child, including, without limitation,
a violation of any provision of NRS 200.508 or 200.5083 or
contributory delinquency;
(10) A violation of any federal or state law regulating the
possession, distribution or use of any controlled substance or any
dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of NRS;
(11) A violation of any federal or state law prohibiting
driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance that is
punishable as a felony;
(12) A violation of any federal or state law prohibiting
driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance, other
than a violation described in subparagraph (11), within the
immediately preceding 3 years;
(13) Abuse, neglect, exploitation, isolation or abandonment
of older persons or vulnerable persons, including, without
limitation, a violation of any provision of NRS 200.5091 to
200.50995, inclusive, or a law of any other jurisdiction that
prohibits the same or similar conduct; or
(14) Any offense involving arson, fraud, theft,
embezzlement, burglary, robbery, fraudulent conversion,
misappropriation of property or perjury within the immediately
preceding 7 years; or
(b) Whether there are criminal charges pending against the
applicant or employee for a violation of an offense listed in
paragraph (a).
-
*AB126*

– 14 –
2. A department of juvenile justice services shall request
information from:
(a) The Statewide Central Registry concerning an applicant for
employment with the department of juvenile justice services, or an
employee of the department of juvenile justice services, to
determine whether there has been a substantiated report of child
abuse or neglect made against the applicant or employee; and
(b) The central registry of information concerning the abuse or
neglect of a child established by any other state in which the
applicant or employee resided within the immediately preceding 5
years to ensure satisfactory clearance with that registry.
3. Each applicant for employment with the department of
juvenile justice services, and each employee of the department of
juvenile justice services, must submit to the department of juvenile
justice services:
(a) A complete set of his or her fingerprints and written
authorization to forward those fingerprints to the Central Repository
for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission to the
Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report; and
(b) Written authorization for the department of juvenile justice
services to obtain any information that may be available from the
Statewide Central Registry or the central registry of information
concerning the abuse or neglect of a child established by any other
state in which the applicant or employee resided within the
immediately preceding 5 years.
4. The department of juvenile justice services may exchange
with the Central Repository or the Federal Bureau of Investigation
any information concerning the fingerprints submitted pursuant to
this section.
5. When a report from the Federal Bureau of Investigation is
received by the Central Repository, the Central Repository shall
immediately forward a copy of the report to the department of
juvenile justice services for a determination of whether the applicant
or employee has criminal charges pending against him or her for a
crime listed in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 or has been convicted
of a crime listed in paragraph (a) of subsection 1.
6. A department of juvenile justice services shall conduct an
investigation of each employee of the department pursuant to this
section at least once every 5 years after the initial investigation.
7. As used in this section, “Statewide Central Registry” means
the Statewide Central Registry for the Collection of Information
Concerning the Abuse or Neglect of a Child established by
NRS 432.100.
-
*AB126*

– 15 –
Sec. 12. NRS 62H.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62H.010 1. The fingerprints of a child must be taken if the
child is in custody for an unlawful act that, if committed by an adult,
would have been:
(a) A felony, gross misdemeanor or sexual offense; or
(b) A misdemeanor and the unlawful act involved:
(1) The use or threatened use of force or violence against the
victim; or
(2) The possession, use or threatened use of a firearm or a
deadly weapon.
2. The fingerprints of a child who is in custody but who is not
subject to the provisions of subsection 1 may be taken if a law
enforcement officer finds latent fingerprints during the investigation
of an offense and the officer has reason to believe that the latent
fingerprints are those of the child. The officer shall use the
fingerprints taken from the child to make an immediate comparison
with the latent fingerprints. If the comparison is:
(a) Negative, the fingerprint card and other copies of the
fingerprints taken may be immediately destroyed or may be retained
for future use.
(b) Positive, the fingerprint card and other copies of the
fingerprints:
(1) Must be delivered to the juvenile court for disposition if
the child is referred to the juvenile court.
(2) May be immediately destroyed or may be retained for
future use if the child is not referred to the juvenile court.
3. Fingerprints that are taken from a child pursuant to the
provisions of this section:
(a) May be retained in a local file or a local system for the
automatic retrieval of fingerprints if they are retained under special
security measures that limit inspection of the fingerprints to law
enforcement officers who are conducting criminal investigations. If
the child from whom the fingerprints are taken subsequently is not
adjudicated delinquent, the parent or guardian of the child or, when
the child becomes at least 18 years of age, the child may petition the
juvenile court for the removal of the fingerprints from any local file
or local system.
(b) Must be submitted to the Central Repository if the child is
adjudicated delinquent for an unlawful act that would have been a
felony or a sexual offense if committed by an adult, and may be
submitted to the Central Repository for any other act. Any such
fingerprints submitted to the Central Repository must be submitted
with a description of the child and the unlawful act, if any, that the
child committed. The Central Repository shall retain the fingerprints
-
*AB126*

– 16 –
and information of the child under special security measures that
limit inspection of the fingerprints and the information to:
(1) Law enforcement officers who are conducting criminal
investigations; and
(2) Officers and employees of the Central Repository who
are assisting law enforcement officers with criminal investigations
or who are conducting research or performing a statistical analysis.
(c) Must not be submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
unless the child is adjudicated delinquent for an unlawful act that
would have been a felony or a sexual offense if committed by an
adult.
4. A child who is in custody must be photographed for the
purpose of identification. Except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, the photographs of the child must be kept in the file
pertaining to the child under special security measures which
provide that the photographs may be inspected only to conduct
criminal investigations and photographic lineups. If the juvenile
court subsequently determines that the child is not delinquent, the
juvenile court shall order the photographs to be destroyed.
5. Any person who willfully violates any provision of this
section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
6. As used in this section, “sexual offense” means:
(a) Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366;
(b) Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368;
(c) Battery with intent to commit sexual assault pursuant to
NRS 200.400;
(d) An offense involving pornography and a minor or an
artificial intelligence-generated minor pursuant to NRS 200.710 to
200.730, inclusive;
(e) Incest pursuant to NRS 201.180;
(f) Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210;
(g) Indecent or obscene exposure pursuant to NRS 201.220;
(h) Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230;
(i) Sexual penetration of a dead human body pursuant to
NRS 201.450;
(j) Luring a child or person with mental illness pursuant to NRS
201.560, if punishable as a felony;
(k) An attempt to commit an offense listed in paragraphs (a) to
(j), inclusive; or
(l) An offense that is determined to be sexually motivated
pursuant to NRS 175.547.
Sec. 13. NRS 62H.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62H.220 1. For each child adjudicated delinquent for an
unlawful act that would have been a sexual offense if committed by
an adult, the Division of Child and Family Services shall collect
-
*AB126*

– 17 –
from the juvenile courts, local juvenile probation departments and
the staff of the youth correctional services, as directed by the
Department of Health and Human Services:
(a) The information listed in NRS 62H.210;
(b) The name of the child; and
(c) All information concerning programs of treatment in which
the child participated that:
(1) Were directly related to the delinquent act committed by
the child; or
(2) Were designed or utilized to prevent the commission of
another such act by the child in the future.
2. The Division of Child and Family Services shall provide the
information collected pursuant to subsection 1 to the Director of the
Department of Health and Human Services for use in the program
established pursuant to NRS 62H.300, 62H.310 and 62H.320.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115, all
information containing the name of the child and all information
relating to programs of treatment in which the child participated is
confidential and must not be used for a purpose other than that
provided for in this section and NRS 62H.320.
4. As used in this section, “sexual offense” means:
(a) Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366;
(b) Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368;
(c) Battery with intent to commit sexual assault pursuant to
NRS 200.400;
(d) An offense involving pornography and a minor or an
artificial intelligence-generated minor pursuant to NRS 200.710 to
200.730, inclusive;
(e) Incest pursuant to NRS 201.180;
(f) Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210;
(g) Indecent or obscene exposure pursuant to NRS 201.220;
(h) Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230;
(i) Sexual penetration of a dead human body pursuant to
NRS 201.450;
(j) Luring a child using a computer, system or network pursuant
to NRS 201.560, if punished as a felony;
(k) Annoyance or molestation of a minor pursuant to
NRS 207.260;
(l) An attempt to commit an offense listed in paragraphs (a) to
(k), inclusive;
(m) An offense that is determined to be sexually motivated
pursuant to NRS 175.547; or
(n) An offense committed in another jurisdiction that, if
committed in this State, would have been an offense listed in this
subsection.
-
*AB126*

– 18 –
Sec. 14. NRS 62H.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62H.310 As used in this section and NRS 62H.300 and
62H.320:
1. “Juvenile sex offender” means a child adjudicated
delinquent for an act that, if committed by an adult, would be a
sexual offense.
2. “Sexual offense” means:
(a) Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366;
(b) Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368;
(c) Battery with intent to commit sexual assault pursuant to
NRS 200.400;
(d) An offense involving pornography and a minor or an
artificial intelligence-generated minor pursuant to NRS 200.710 to
200.730, inclusive;
(e) Incest pursuant to NRS 201.180;
(f) Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210;
(g) Indecent or obscene exposure pursuant to NRS 201.220;
(h) Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230;
(i) Sexual penetration of a dead human body pursuant to
NRS 201.450;
(j) Luring a child or a person with mental illness pursuant to
NRS 201.560, if punished as a felony;
(k) An attempt to commit an offense listed in paragraphs (a) to
(j), inclusive;
(l) An offense that is determined to be sexually motivated
pursuant to NRS 175.547; or
(m) An offense committed in another jurisdiction that, if
committed in this State, would be an offense listed in this
subsection.
Sec. 15. NRS 176.0931 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176.0931 1. If a defendant is convicted of a sexual offense,
the court shall include in sentencing, in addition to any other
penalties provided by law, a special sentence of lifetime supervision.
2. The special sentence of lifetime supervision commences
after any period of probation or any term of imprisonment and any
period of release on parole.
3. A person sentenced to lifetime supervision may petition the
sentencing court or the State Board of Parole Commissioners for
release from lifetime supervision. The sentencing court or the Board
shall grant a petition for release from a special sentence of lifetime
supervision if:
(a) The person has complied with the requirements of the
provisions of NRS 179D.010 to 179D.550, inclusive;
(b) The person has not been convicted of an offense that poses a
threat to the safety or well-being of others for an interval of at least
-
*AB126*

– 19 –
10 consecutive years after the person’s last conviction or release
from incarceration, whichever occurs later; and
(c) The person is not likely to pose a threat to the safety of
others, as determined by a licensed, clinical professional who has
received training in the treatment of sexual offenders, if released
from lifetime supervision.
4. A person who is released from lifetime supervision pursuant
to the provisions of subsection 3 remains subject to the provisions
for registration as a sex offender and to the provisions for
community notification, unless the person is otherwise relieved from
the operation of those provisions pursuant to the provisions of NRS
179D.010 to 179D.550, inclusive.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Offense that poses a threat to the safety or well-being of
others” includes, without limitation:
(1) An offense that involves:
(I) A victim less than 18 years of age;
(II) A crime against a child as defined in
NRS 179D.0357;
(III) A sexual offense as defined in NRS 179D.097;
(IV) A deadly weapon, explosives or a firearm;
(V) The use or threatened use of force or violence;
(VI) Physical or mental abuse;
(VII) Death or bodily injury;
(VIII) An act of domestic violence;
(IX) Harassment, stalking, threats of any kind or other
similar acts;
(X) The forcible or unlawful entry of a home, building,
structure, vehicle or other real or personal property; or
(XI) The infliction or threatened infliction of damage or
injury, in whole or in part, to real or personal property.
(2) Any offense listed in subparagraph (1) that is committed
in this State or another jurisdiction, including, without limitation, an
offense prosecuted in:
(I) A tribal court.
(II) A court of the United States or the Armed Forces of
the United States.
(b) “Sexual offense” means:
(1) A violation of NRS 200.366, subsection 4 of NRS
200.400, NRS 200.710, 200.720, paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of
NRS 200.730, paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 200.975, NRS
201.180, 201.230, 201.450, 201.540 or 201.550 or paragraph (a) or
(b) of subsection 4 or paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 5 of
NRS 201.560;
-
*AB126*

– 20 –
(2) An attempt to commit an offense listed in subparagraph
(1); or
(3) An act of murder in the first or second degree,
kidnapping in the first or second degree, false imprisonment,
burglary or invasion of the home if the act is determined to be
sexually motivated at a hearing conducted pursuant to NRS 175.547.
Sec. 16. NRS 176.133 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176.133 As used in NRS 176.133 to 176.161, inclusive, unless
the context otherwise requires:
1. “Person professionally qualified to conduct psychosexual
evaluations” means a person who has received training in
conducting psychosexual evaluations and is:
(a) A psychiatrist licensed to practice medicine in this State and
certified by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, Inc.;
(b) A psychologist licensed to practice in this State;
(c) A social worker holding a master’s degree in social work and
licensed in this State as a clinical social worker;
(d) A registered nurse holding a master’s degree in the field of
psychiatric nursing and licensed to practice professional nursing in
this State;
(e) A marriage and family therapist licensed in this State
pursuant to chapter 641A of NRS; or
(f) A clinical professional counselor licensed in this State
pursuant to chapter 641A of NRS.
2. “Psychosexual evaluation” means an evaluation conducted
pursuant to NRS 176.139.
3. “Sexual offense” means:
(a) Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366;
(b) Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368, if
punished as a felony;
(c) Battery with intent to commit sexual assault pursuant to
NRS 200.400;
(d) Abuse of a child pursuant to NRS 200.508, if the abuse
involved sexual abuse or sexual exploitation and is punished as a
felony;
(e) An offense involving pornography and a minor or an
artificial intelligence-generated minor pursuant to NRS 200.710 to
200.730, inclusive;
(f) Fertility fraud pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
NRS 200.975;
(g) Incest pursuant to NRS 201.180;
(h) Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210, if
punished as a felony;
(i) Indecent or obscene exposure pursuant to NRS 201.220, if
punished as a felony;
-
*AB126*

– 21 –
(j) Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230;
(k) Soliciting a child for prostitution pursuant to NRS 201.354;
(l) Sexual penetration of a dead human body pursuant to
NRS 201.450;
(m) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a school or
volunteers at a school and a pupil pursuant to NRS 201.540;
(n) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a college or
university and a student pursuant to NRS 201.550;
(o) Luring a child or a person with mental illness pursuant to
NRS 201.560, if punished as a felony;
(p) An attempt to commit an offense listed in paragraphs (a) to
(o), inclusive, if punished as a felony; or
(q) An offense that is determined to be sexually motivated
pursuant to NRS 175.547 or 207.193.
Sec. 17. NRS 176A.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176A.110 1. The court shall not grant probation to or
suspend the sentence of a person convicted of an offense listed in
subsection 3 unless:
(a) If a psychosexual evaluation of the person is required
pursuant to NRS 176.139, the person who conducts the
psychosexual evaluation certifies in the report prepared pursuant to
NRS 176.139 that the person convicted of the offense does not
represent a high risk to reoffend based upon a currently accepted
standard of assessment; or
(b) If a psychosexual evaluation of the person is not required
pursuant to NRS 176.139, a psychologist licensed to practice in this
State who is trained to conduct psychosexual evaluations or a
psychiatrist licensed to practice medicine in this State who is
certified by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, Inc.,
and is trained to conduct psychosexual evaluations certifies in a
written report to the court that the person convicted of the offense
does not represent a high risk to reoffend based upon a currently
accepted standard of assessment.
2. This section does not create a right in any person to be
certified or to continue to be certified. No person may bring a cause
of action against the State, its political subdivisions, or the agencies,
boards, commissions, departments, officers or employees of the
State or its political subdivisions for not certifying a person pursuant
to this section or for refusing to consider a person for certification
pursuant to this section.
3. The provisions of this section apply to a person convicted of
any of the following offenses:
(a) Attempted sexual assault of a person who is 16 years of age
or older pursuant to NRS 200.366.
(b) Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368.
-
*AB126*

– 22 –
(c) Battery with intent to commit sexual assault pursuant to
NRS 200.400.
(d) Abuse or neglect of a child pursuant to NRS 200.508.
(e) An offense involving pornography and a minor or an
artificial intelligence-generated minor pursuant to NRS 200.710 to
200.730, inclusive.
(f) Fertility fraud pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
NRS 200.975.
(g) Incest pursuant to NRS 201.180.
(h) Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210.
(i) Indecent or obscene exposure pursuant to NRS 201.220.
(j) Soliciting a child for prostitution pursuant to NRS 201.354.
(k) Sexual penetration of a dead human body pursuant to
NRS 201.450.
(l) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a school or
volunteers at a school and a pupil pursuant to NRS 201.540.
(m) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a college or
university and a student pursuant to NRS 201.550.
(n) Luring a child or a person with mental illness pursuant to
NRS 201.560, if punished as a felony.
(o) A violation of NRS 207.180.
(p) An attempt to commit an offense listed in paragraphs (b) to
(o), inclusive.
(q) Coercion or attempted coercion that is determined to be
sexually motivated pursuant to NRS 207.193.
Sec. 18. NRS 176A.413 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176A.413 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, if
a defendant is convicted of stalking with the use of an Internet or
network site, electronic mail, text messaging or any other similar
means of communication pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS 200.575,
an offense involving pornography and a minor or an artificial
intelligence-generated minor pursuant to NRS 200.710 to 200.730,
inclusive, luring a child or a person with mental illness through the
use of a computer, system or network pursuant to paragraph (a) or
(b) of subsection 4 of NRS 201.560 or a violation of NRS 201.553
which involved the use of an electronic communication device and
the court grants probation or suspends the sentence, the court shall,
in addition to any other condition ordered pursuant to NRS
176A.400, order as a condition of probation or suspension that the
defendant not own or use a computer, including, without limitation,
use electronic mail, a chat room or the Internet.
2. The court is not required to impose a condition of probation
or suspension of sentence set forth in subsection 1 if the court finds
that:
-
*AB126*

– 23 –
(a) The use of a computer by the defendant will assist a law
enforcement agency or officer in a criminal investigation;
(b) The defendant will use the computer to provide
technological training concerning technology of which the
defendant has a unique knowledge; or
(c) The use of the computer by the defendant will assist
companies that require the use of the specific technological
knowledge of the defendant that is unique and is otherwise
unavailable to the company.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1, if a defendant
is convicted of an offense that involved the use of a computer,
system or network and the court grants probation or suspends the
sentence, the court may, in addition to any other condition ordered
pursuant to NRS 176A.400, order as a condition of probation or
suspension that the defendant not own or use a computer, including,
without limitation, use electronic mail, a chat room or the Internet.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Computer” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 205.4735
and includes, without limitation, an electronic communication
device.
(b) “Electronic communication device” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 200.737.
(c) “Network” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 205.4745.
(d) “System” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 205.476.
(e) “Text messaging” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 200.575.
Sec. 19. NRS 178.5698 is hereby amended to read as follows:
178.5698 1. The prosecuting attorney, sheriff or chief of
police shall, upon the request of a victim or witness, inform the
victim or witness:
(a) When the defendant is released from custody at any time
before or during the trial, including, without limitation, when the
defendant is released pending trial or subject to electronic
supervision;
(b) If the defendant is so released, the amount of bail required, if
any; and
(c) Of the final disposition of the criminal case in which the
victim or witness was directly involved.
2. A request for information made pursuant to subsection 1
must be made:
(a) In writing; or
(b) By telephone through an automated or computerized system
of notification, if such a system is available.
-
*AB126*

– 24 –
3. If an offender is convicted of a sexual offense or an offense
involving the use or threatened use of force or violence against the
victim, the court shall provide:
(a) To each witness, documentation that includes:
(1) A form advising the witness of the right to be notified
pursuant to subsection 5;
(2) The form that the witness must use to request notification
in writing; and
(3) The form or procedure that the witness must use to
provide a change of address after a request for notification has been
submitted.
(b) To each person listed in subsection 4, documentation that
includes:
(1) A form advising the person of the right to be notified
pursuant to subsection 5 or 6 and NRS 176.015, 176A.630,
178.4715, 209.392, 209.3923, 209.3925, 209.429, 209.521, 213.010,
213.040, 213.095 and 213.131 or NRS 213.10915;
(2) The forms that the person must use to request
notification; and
(3) The forms or procedures that the person must use to
provide a change of address after a request for notification has been
submitted.
4. The following persons are entitled to receive documentation
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 3:
(a) A person against whom the offense is committed.
(b) A person who is injured as a direct result of the commission
of the offense.
(c) If a person listed in paragraph (a) or (b) is under the age of
18 years, each parent or guardian who is not the offender.
(d) Each surviving spouse, parent and child of a person who is
killed as a direct result of the commission of the offense.
(e) A relative of a person listed in paragraphs (a) to (d),
inclusive, if the relative requests in writing to be provided with the
documentation.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, if the offense
was a felony and the offender is imprisoned, the warden of the
prison shall, if the victim or witness so requests in writing and
provides a current address, notify the victim or witness at that
address when the offender is released from the prison.
6. If the offender was convicted of a violation of subsection 3
of NRS 200.366 or a violation of subsection 1, paragraph (a) of
subsection 2 or subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of
NRS 200.508, the warden of the prison shall notify:
(a) The immediate family of the victim if the immediate family
provides their current address;
-
*AB126*

– 25 –
(b) Any member of the victim’s family related within the third
degree of consanguinity, if the member of the victim’s family so
requests in writing and provides a current address; and
(c) The victim, if the victim will be 18 years of age or older at
the time of the release and has provided a current address,
 before the offender is released from prison.
7. The warden must not be held responsible for any injury
proximately caused by the failure to give any notice required
pursuant to this section if no address was provided to the warden or
if the address provided is inaccurate or not current.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Immediate family” means any adult relative of the victim
living in the victim’s household.
(b) “Sexual offense” means:
(1) Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366;
(2) Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368;
(3) Battery with intent to commit sexual assault pursuant to
NRS 200.400;
(4) An offense involving pornography and a minor or an
artificial intelligence-generated minor pursuant to NRS 200.710 to
200.730, inclusive;
(5) Fertility fraud pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1
of NRS 200.975;
(6) Incest pursuant to NRS 201.180;
(7) Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210;
(8) Indecent or obscene exposure pursuant to NRS 201.220;
(9) Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230;
(10) Sexual penetration of a dead human body pursuant to
NRS 201.450;
(11) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a school
or volunteers at a school and a pupil pursuant to NRS 201.540;
(12) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a college
or university and a student pursuant to NRS 201.550;
(13) Luring a child or a person with mental illness pursuant
to NRS 201.560, if punished as a felony;
(14) An offense that, pursuant to a specific statute, is
determined to be sexually motivated; or
(15) An attempt to commit an offense listed in this
paragraph.
Sec. 20. NRS 179.245 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.245 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 and
NRS 176.211, 176A.245, 176A.265, 176A.295, 179.247, 179.259,
201.354 and 453.3365, a person may petition the court in which the
person was convicted for the sealing of all records relating to a
conviction of:
-
*AB126*

– 26 –
(a) A category A felony, a crime of violence or residential
burglary pursuant to NRS 205.060 after 10 years from the date of
release from actual custody or discharge from parole or probation,
whichever occurs later;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (a) and (e), a
category B, C or D felony after 5 years from the date of release from
actual custody or discharge from parole or probation, whichever
occurs later;
(c) A category E felony after 2 years from the date of release
from actual custody or discharge from parole or probation,
whichever occurs later;
(d) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e), any gross
misdemeanor after 2 years from the date of release from actual
custody or discharge from probation, whichever occurs later;
(e) A violation of NRS 422.540 to 422.570, inclusive, a
violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 other than a felony, or a
battery which constitutes domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018
other than a felony, after 7 years from the date of release from actual
custody or from the date when the person is no longer under a
suspended sentence, whichever occurs later;
(f) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e), if the offense
is punished as a misdemeanor, a battery pursuant to NRS 200.481,
harassment pursuant to NRS 200.571, stalking pursuant to NRS
200.575 or a violation of a temporary or extended order for
protection, after 2 years from the date of release from actual custody
or from the date when the person is no longer under a suspended
sentence, whichever occurs later; or
(g) Any other misdemeanor after 1 year from the date of release
from actual custody or from the date when the person is no longer
under a suspended sentence, whichever occurs later.
2. A petition filed pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Be accompanied by the petitioner’s current, verified records
received from the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History;
(b) If the petition references NRS 453.3365, include a certificate
of acknowledgment or the disposition of the proceedings for the
records to be sealed from all agencies of criminal justice which
maintain such records;
(c) Include a list of any other public or private agency, company,
official or other custodian of records that is reasonably known to the
petitioner to have possession of records of the conviction and to
whom the order to seal records, if issued, will be directed;
(d) Include information that, to the best knowledge and belief of
the petitioner, accurately and completely identifies the records to be
sealed, including, without limitation, the:
-
*AB126*

– 27 –
(1) Date of birth of the petitioner;
(2) Specific conviction to which the records to be sealed
pertain; and
(3) Date of arrest relating to the specific conviction to which
the records to be sealed pertain; and
(e) If applicable, include a statement from the petitioner
certifying that at the time the crime for which the records to be
sealed was committed, the petitioner was being sex trafficked
pursuant to NRS 201.300.
3. Upon receiving a petition pursuant to this section, the court
shall notify the law enforcement agency that arrested the petitioner
for the crime and the prosecuting attorney, including, without
limitation, the Attorney General, who prosecuted the petitioner for
the crime. The prosecuting attorney and any person having relevant
evidence may testify and present evidence at any hearing on the
petition.
4. If the prosecuting agency that prosecuted the petitioner for
the crime stipulates to the sealing of the records, the court shall
apply the presumption set forth in NRS 179.2445 and seal the
records. If the prosecuting agency does not stipulate to the sealing of
the records or does not file a written objection within 30 days after
receiving notification pursuant to subsection 3 and the court makes
the findings set forth in subsection 5, the court may order the sealing
of the records in accordance with subsection 5 without a hearing. If
the court does not order the sealing of the records or the prosecuting
agency files a written objection, a hearing on the petition must be
conducted. At the hearing, unless an objecting party presents
evidence sufficient to rebut the presumption set forth in NRS
179.2445, the court shall apply the presumption and seal the records.
5. If the court finds that, in the period prescribed in subsection
1, the petitioner has not been charged with any offense for which the
charges are pending or convicted of any offense, except for minor
moving or standing traffic violations, the court may order sealed all
records of the conviction which are in the custody of any agency of
criminal justice or any public or private agency, company, official
or other custodian of records in the State of Nevada, and may also
order all such records of the petitioner returned to the file of the
court where the proceeding was commenced from, including,
without limitation, the Federal Bureau of Investigation and all other
agencies of criminal justice which maintain such records and which
are reasonably known by either the petitioner or the court to have
possession of such records.
6. A person may not petition the court to seal records relating
to a conviction of:
(a) A crime against a child;
-
*AB126*

– 28 –
(b) A sexual offense;
(c) Invasion of the home with a deadly weapon pursuant to
NRS 205.067;
(d) A violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 that is punishable
as a felony pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of
NRS 484C.400;
(e) A violation of NRS 484C.430;
(f) A homicide resulting from driving or being in actual physical
control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or a controlled substance or resulting from any other conduct
prohibited by NRS 484C.110, 484C.130 or 484C.430;
(g) A violation of NRS 488.410 that is punishable as a felony
pursuant to NRS 488.427; or
(h) A violation of NRS 488.420 or 488.425.
7. The provisions of paragraph (e) of subsection 1 and
paragraph (d) of subsection 6 must not be construed to preclude a
person from being able to petition the court to seal records relating
to a conviction for a violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120
pursuant to this section if the person was found guilty of a violation
of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 that is punishable pursuant to:
(a) Paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400; or
(b) Paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400 but had a
judgment of conviction entered against him or her for a violation of
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400 because the person
participated in the statewide sobriety and drug monitoring program
established pursuant to NRS 484C.392.
8. If the court grants a petition for the sealing of records
pursuant to this section, upon the request of the person whose
records are sealed, the court may order sealed all records of the civil
proceeding in which the records were sealed.
9. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no fee may be
charged by any court or agency of criminal justice in this State
related to a petition for the sealing of records pursuant to this section
if, at the time the crime for which the records to be sealed was
committed, the petitioner was being sex trafficked pursuant to NRS
201.300. As used in this subsection, “fee” includes, without
limitation, any fee to file a petition, obtain fingerprints if provided
by a governmental agency of this State, obtain any records of
criminal history, obtain records of past arrests and convictions or
obtain or certify copies of documents pursuant to NRS 19.013 and
any other fee related to the sealing of records pursuant to this
section.
10. As used in this section:
(a) “Crime against a child” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 179D.0357.
-
*AB126*

– 29 –
(b) “Sexual offense” means:
(1) Murder of the first degree committed in the perpetration
or attempted perpetration of sexual assault or of sexual abuse or
sexual molestation of a child less than 14 years of age pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 200.030.
(2) Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366.
(3) Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368, if
punishable as a felony.
(4) Battery with intent to commit sexual assault pursuant to
NRS 200.400.
(5) An offense involving the administration of a drug to
another person with the intent to enable or assist the commission of
a felony pursuant to NRS 200.405, if the felony is an offense listed
in this paragraph.
(6) An offense involving the administration of a controlled
substance to another person with the intent to enable or assist the
commission of a crime of violence, if the crime of violence is an
offense listed in this paragraph.
(7) Abuse of a child pursuant to NRS 200.508, if the abuse
involved sexual abuse or sexual exploitation.
(8) An offense involving pornography and a minor or an
artificial intelligence-generated minor pursuant to NRS 200.710 to
200.730, inclusive.
(9) Fertility fraud pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1
of NRS 200.975.
(10) Incest pursuant to NRS 201.180.
(11) Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210, if
punishable as a felony.
(12) Indecent or obscene exposure pursuant to NRS 201.220,
if punishable as a felony.
(13) Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230.
(14) Sexual penetration of a dead human body pursuant to
NRS 201.450.
(15) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a school
or volunteers at a school and a pupil pursuant to NRS 201.540.
(16) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a college
or university and a student pursuant to NRS 201.550.
(17) Luring a child or a person with mental illness pursuant
to NRS 201.560, if punishable as a felony.
(18) An attempt to commit an offense listed in this
paragraph.
Sec. 21. NRS 179D.097 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179D.097 1. “Sexual offense” means any of the following
offenses:
-
*AB126*

– 30 –
(a) Murder of the first degree committed in the perpetration or
attempted perpetration of sexual assault or of sexual abuse or sexual
molestation of a child less than 14 years of age pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 200.030.
(b) Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366.
(c) Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368.
(d) Battery with intent to commit sexual assault pursuant to
subsection 4 of NRS 200.400.
(e) An offense involving the administration of a drug to another
person with the intent to enable or assist the commission of a felony
pursuant to NRS 200.405, if the felony is an offense listed in this
subsection.
(f) An offense involving the administration of a controlled
substance to another person with the intent to enable or assist the
commission of a crime of violence, if the crime of violence is an
offense listed in this section.
(g) Abuse of a child pursuant to NRS 200.508, if the abuse
involved sexual abuse or sexual exploitation.
(h) An offense involving pornography and a minor or an
artificial intelligence-generated minor pursuant to NRS 200.710 to
200.730, inclusive.
(i) Fertility fraud pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
NRS 200.975.
(j) Incest pursuant to NRS 201.180.
(k) Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210.
(l) Indecent or obscene exposure pursuant to NRS 201.220.
(m) Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230.
(n) Sexual penetration of a dead human body pursuant to
NRS 201.450.
(o) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a school or
volunteers at a school and a pupil pursuant to NRS 201.540.
(p) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a college or
university and a student pursuant to NRS 201.550.
(q) Luring a child or a person with mental illness pursuant to
NRS 201.560, if punished as a felony.
(r) Sex trafficking pursuant to NRS 201.300.
(s) Any other offense that has an element involving a sexual act
or sexual conduct with another.
(t) An attempt or conspiracy to commit an offense listed in
paragraphs (a) to (s), inclusive.
(u) An offense that is determined to be sexually motivated
pursuant to NRS 175.547 or 207.193.
(v) An offense committed in another jurisdiction that, if
committed in this State, would be an offense listed in this
-
*AB126*

– 31 –
subsection. This paragraph includes, without limitation, an offense
prosecuted in:
(1) A tribal court.
(2) A court of the United States or the Armed Forces of the
United States.
(w) An offense of a sexual nature committed in another
jurisdiction, whether or not the offense would be an offense listed in
this section, if the person who committed the offense resides or has
resided or is or has been a student or worker in any jurisdiction in
which the person is or has been required by the laws of that
jurisdiction to register as a sex offender because of the offense. This
paragraph includes, without limitation, an offense prosecuted in:
(1) A tribal court.
(2) A court of the United States or the Armed Forces of the
United States.
(3) A court having jurisdiction over juveniles.
2. Except for the offenses described in paragraphs (o) and (p)
of subsection 1, the term does not include an offense involving
consensual sexual conduct if the victim was:
(a) An adult, unless the adult was under the custodial authority
of the offender at the time of the offense; or
(b) At least 13 years of age and the offender was not more than
4 years older than the victim at the time of the commission of the
offense.
Sec. 22. NRS 179D.115 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179D.115 “Tier II offender” means an offender convicted of a
crime against a child or a sex offender, other than a Tier III
offender, whose crime against a child is punishable by
imprisonment for more than 1 year or whose sexual offense:
1. If committed against a child, constitutes:
(a) Luring a child pursuant to NRS 201.560, if punishable as a
felony;
(b) Abuse of a child pursuant to NRS 200.508, if the abuse
involved sexual abuse or sexual exploitation;
(c) An offense involving sex trafficking pursuant to NRS
201.300 or prostitution pursuant to NRS 201.320 or 201.395;
(d) An offense involving pornography and a minor or an
artificial intelligence-generated minor pursuant to NRS 200.710 to
200.730, inclusive; or
(e) Any other offense that is comparable to or more severe than
the offenses described in 34 U.S.C. § 20911(3);
2. Involves an attempt or conspiracy to commit any offense
described in subsection 1;
3. If committed in another jurisdiction, is an offense that, if
committed in this State, would be an offense listed in this section.
-
*AB126*

– 32 –
This subsection includes, without limitation, an offense prosecuted
in:
(a) A tribal court; or
(b) A court of the United States or the Armed Forces of the
United States; or
4. Is committed after the person becomes a Tier I offender if
any of the person’s sexual offenses constitute an offense punishable
by imprisonment for more than 1 year.
Sec. 23. NRS 213.1258 is hereby amended to read as follows:
213.1258 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, if
the Board releases on parole a prisoner convicted of stalking with
the use of an Internet or network site, electronic mail, text
messaging or any other similar means of communication pursuant to
subsection 4 of NRS 200.575, an offense involving pornography
and a minor or an artificial intelligence-generated minor pursuant
to NRS 200.710 to 200.730, inclusive, luring a child or a person
with mental illness through the use of a computer, system or
network pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 4 of NRS
201.560 or a violation of NRS 201.553 which involved the use of an
electronic communication device, the Board shall, in addition to any
other condition of parole, require as a condition of parole that the
parolee not own or use a computer, including, without limitation,
use electronic mail, a chat room or the Internet.
2. The Board is not required to impose a condition of parole set
forth in subsection 1 if the Board finds that:
(a) The use of a computer by the parolee will assist a law
enforcement agency or officer in a criminal investigation;
(b) The parolee will use the computer to provide technological
training concerning technology of which the defendant has a unique
knowledge; or
(c) The use of the computer by the parolee will assist companies
that require the use of the specific technological knowledge of the
parolee that is unique and is otherwise unavailable to the company.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1, if the Board
releases on parole a prisoner convicted of an offense that involved
the use of a computer, system or network, the Board may, in
addition to any other condition of parole, require as a condition of
parole that the parolee not own or use a computer, including,
without limitation, use electronic mail, a chat room or the Internet.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Computer” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 205.4735
and includes, without limitation, an electronic communication
device.
(b) “Electronic communication device” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 200.737.
-
*AB126*

– 33 –
(c) “Network” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 205.4745.
(d) “System” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 205.476.
(e) “Text messaging” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 200.575.
Sec. 24. NRS 432B.198 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432B.198 1. An agency which provides child welfare
services shall secure from appropriate law enforcement agencies
information on the background and personal history of each
applicant for employment with the agency, and each employee of
the agency, to determine:
(a) Whether the applicant or employee has been convicted of:
(1) Murder, voluntary manslaughter, involuntary
manslaughter or mayhem;
(2) Any other felony involving the use or threatened use of
force or violence or the use of a firearm or other deadly weapon;
(3) Assault with intent to kill or to commit sexual assault or
mayhem;
(4) Battery which results in substantial bodily harm to the
victim;
(5) Battery that constitutes domestic violence that is
punishable as a felony;
(6) Battery that constitutes domestic violence, other than a
battery described in subparagraph (5), within the immediately
preceding 3 years;
(7) Sexual assault, statutory sexual seduction, incest,
lewdness, indecent exposure, an offense involving pornography and
a minor or an artificial intelligence-generated minor or any other
sexually related crime;
(8) A crime involving pandering or prostitution, including,
without limitation, a violation of any provision of NRS 201.295 to
201.440, inclusive, other than a violation of NRS 201.354 by
engaging in prostitution;
(9) Abuse or neglect of a child, including, without limitation,
a violation of any provision of NRS 200.508 or 200.5083;
(10) A violation of any federal or state law regulating the
possession, distribution or use of any controlled substance or any
dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of NRS within the
immediately preceding 3 years;
(11) A violation of any federal or state law prohibiting
driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance that is
punishable as a felony;
(12) A violation of any federal or state law prohibiting
driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance, other
-
*AB126*

– 34 –
than a violation described in subparagraph (11), within the
immediately preceding 3 years;
(13) Abuse, neglect, exploitation, isolation or abandonment
of older persons or vulnerable persons, including, without
limitation, a violation of any provision of NRS 200.5091 to
200.50995, inclusive, or a law of any other jurisdiction that
prohibits the same or similar conduct; or
(14) Any offense involving arson, fraud, theft,
embezzlement, burglary, robbery, fraudulent conversion,
misappropriation of property or perjury within the immediately
preceding 7 years; or
(b) Whether there are criminal charges pending against the
applicant or employee for a crime listed in paragraph (a).
2. An agency which provides child welfare services shall
request information from:
(a) The Statewide Central Registry concerning an applicant for
employment with the agency, or an employee of the agency, to
determine whether there has been a substantiated report of child
abuse or neglect made against the applicant or employee; and
(b) The central registry of information concerning the abuse or
neglect of a child established by any other state in which the
applicant or employee resided within the immediately preceding 5
years to ensure satisfactory clearance with that registry.
3. Each applicant for employment with an agency which
provides child welfare services, and each employee of an agency
which provides child welfare services, must submit to the agency:
(a) A complete set of his or her fingerprints and written
authorization to forward those fingerprints to the Central Repository
for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission to the
Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report; and
(b) Written authorization for the agency to obtain any
information that may be available from the Statewide Central
Registry or the central registry of information concerning the abuse
or neglect of a child established by any other state in which the
applicant or employee resided within the immediately preceding 5
years.
4. An agency which provides child welfare services may
exchange with the Central Repository or the Federal Bureau of
Investigation any information concerning the fingerprints submitted
pursuant to this section.
5. When a report from the Federal Bureau of Investigation is
received by the Central Repository, the Central Repository shall
immediately forward a copy of the report to the agency which
provides child welfare services for a determination of whether the
applicant or employee has criminal charges pending against him or
-
*AB126*

– 35 –
her for a crime listed in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 or has been
convicted of a crime listed in paragraph (a) of subsection 1.
6. An agency which provides child welfare services shall
conduct an investigation of each employee of the agency pursuant to
this section at least once every 5 years after the initial investigation.
7. For the purposes of this section, the period during which
criminal charges are pending against an applicant or employee for a
crime listed in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 begins when the
applicant or employee is arrested for such a crime and ends when:
(a) A determination is made as to the guilt or innocence of the
applicant or employee with regard to such a crime at a trial or by a
plea; or
(b) The prosecuting attorney makes a determination to:
(1) Decline charging the applicant or employee with a crime
listed in paragraph (a) of subsection 1; or
(2) Proceed with charges against the applicant or employee
for only one or more crimes not listed in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1.
8. As used in this section, “Statewide Central Registry” means
the Statewide Central Registry for the Collection of Information
Concerning the Abuse or Neglect of a Child established by
NRS 432.100.
Sec. 25. NRS 433B.183 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433B.183 1. A division facility which provides residential
treatment to children shall secure from appropriate law enforcement
agencies information on the background and personal history of
each employee of the facility to determine:
(a) Whether the employee has been convicted of:
(1) Murder, voluntary manslaughter, involuntary
manslaughter or mayhem;
(2) Any other felony involving the use or threatened use of
force or violence or the use of a firearm or other deadly weapon;
(3) Assault with intent to kill or to commit sexual assault or
mayhem;
(4) Battery which results in substantial bodily harm to the
victim;
(5) Battery that constitutes domestic violence that is
punishable as a felony;
(6) Battery that constitutes domestic violence, other than a
battery described in subparagraph (5), within the immediately
preceding 3 years;
(7) Sexual assault, statutory sexual seduction, incest,
lewdness, indecent exposure, an offense involving pornography and
a minor or an artificial intelligence-generated minor or any other
sexually related crime;
-
*AB126*

– 36 –
(8) A crime involving pandering or prostitution, including,
without limitation, a violation of any provision of NRS 201.295 to
201.440, inclusive, other than a violation of NRS 201.354 by
engaging in prostitution;
(9) Abuse or neglect of a child, including, without limitation,
a violation of any provision of NRS 200.508 or 200.5083;
(10) A violation of any federal or state law regulating the
possession, distribution or use of any controlled substance or any
dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of NRS within the
immediately preceding 3 years;
(11) A violation of any federal or state law prohibiting
driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance that is
punishable as a felony;
(12) A violation of any federal or state law prohibiting
driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance, other
than a violation described in subparagraph (11), within the
immediately preceding 3 years;
(13) Abuse, neglect, exploitation, isolation or abandonment
of older persons or vulnerable persons, including, without
limitation, a violation of any provision of NRS 200.5091 to
200.50995, inclusive, or a law of any other jurisdiction that
prohibits the same or similar conduct; or
(14) Any offense involving arson, fraud, theft,
embezzlement, burglary, robbery, fraudulent conversion,
misappropriation of property or perjury within the immediately
preceding 7 years; or
(b) Whether there are criminal charges pending against the
employee for a crime listed in paragraph (a).
2. An employee must submit to the Division a complete set of
fingerprints and written authorization to forward those fingerprints
to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History
for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report.
3. The Division may exchange with the Central Repository or
the Federal Bureau of Investigation any information concerning the
fingerprints submitted.
4. The Division may charge an employee investigated pursuant
to this section for the reasonable cost of that investigation.
5. When a report from the Federal Bureau of Investigation is
received by the Central Repository, the Central Repository shall
immediately forward a copy of the report to the Division for a
determination of whether the employee has criminal charges
pending against him or her for a crime listed in paragraph (a) of
-
*AB126*

– 37 –
subsection 1 or has been convicted of a crime listed in paragraph (a)
of subsection 1.
6. An employee who is required to submit to an investigation
required pursuant to this section shall not have contact with a child
in a division facility without supervision before the investigation of
the background and personal history of the employee has been
conducted.
7. The division facility shall conduct an investigation of each
employee pursuant to this section at least once every 5 years after
the initial investigation.
8. For the purposes of this section, the period during which
criminal charges are pending against an employee for a crime listed
in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 begins when the employee is
arrested for such a crime and ends when:
(a) A determination is made as to the guilt or innocence of the
employee with regard to such a crime at a trial or by a plea; or
(b) The prosecuting attorney makes a determination to:
(1) Decline charging the employee with a crime listed in
paragraph (a) of subsection 1; or
(2) Proceed with charges against the employee for only one
or more crimes not listed in paragraph (a) of subsection 1.
Sec. 26. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB126*